Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 4. Bonds, Trust Indentures and Mortgages.

§ 36-29.
Power to issue bonds; liability in general.

An authority shall have power to issue bonds from time to time in its discretion, for any of its corporate purposes. An authority shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued by it or for the purpose of refunding loans made by another entity if such loans could have been made by the authority. An authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing):

Bonds on which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the income and revenues of the housing project financed with the proceeds of such bonds; or

Exclusively from the income and revenues of certain designated housing projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; or

From its revenues generally.

Bonds on which the principal is payable solely from annual contributions or grants received from the federal government or received from any other source, public or private.Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant or contributions from the federal government or other source, or a pledge of any income or revenues of the authority, or a mortgage of any housing project, projects or other property of the authority.Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of an authority (and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face) shall not be a debt of the city, the county, the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof (other than the authority) and neither the city or the county, nor the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof (other than the authority) shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of the authority. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction.

History.

1938, p. 454; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(14); 2002, c. 548.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 548 added “or for the purpose of refunding loans made by another entity if such loans could have been made by the authority” at the end of the second sentence in the introductory language.

§ 36-30.
Form and sale of bonds; presumption of validity.

Bonds of an authority shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank of priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution, its trust indenture or mortgage may provide.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale at not less than par.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such delivery. Any provisions of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action or proceedings involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of an authority or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority to aid in financing a housing project to provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for a housing project of such character and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and constructed in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

History.

1938, p. 454; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(15); 1972, c. 466; 1980, c. 133.

§ 36-31.
Provisions of bonds, trust indentures and mortgages.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations under leases and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, an authority, in addition to its other powers, shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees or revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence.

To mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property, then owned or thereafter acquired.

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues, or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal property, to which its right or title then exists or may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or property; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any housing project or any part thereof; and to covenant as to what other, or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it.

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon; and to redeem the bonds, and to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant (subject to the limitations contained in this chapter) as to the rents and fees to be charged in the operation of a housing project or projects, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to create or to authorize the creation of special funds for moneys held for construction or operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in such funds.

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given.

To covenant as to the use of any or all of its real or personal property; and to covenant as to the maintenance of its real and personal property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation; and to covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

To vest in a trust or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in a trustee or trustees the right, in the event of a default by the authority, to take possession and use, operate and manage any housing project or part thereof, and to collect the rents and revenues arising therefrom and to dispose of such moneys in accordance with the agreement of the authority with the trustee; to provide for the powers and duties of a trustee or trustees and to limit the liabilities thereof; and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any portion of them may enforce any covenant or right securing or relating to the bonds.

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers herein granted; and to make covenants other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character.

History.

1938, p. 455; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(16).

§ 36-32.
Remedies of obligee of authority.

An obligee of an authority shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity to compel the authority and the commissioners, officers, agents or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any contract of the authority with or for the benefit of such obligee, and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements of the authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the authority by this chapter.

By suit, action or proceeding in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority.

History.

1938, p. 456; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(17).

§ 36-33.
Additional remedies conferrable by authority.

An authority shall have power by its resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, the right (in addition to all rights that may otherwise be conferred), upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any such obligee.

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of the authority or any part thereof and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver be appointed, he may enter and take possession of such housing project or any part thereof and operate and maintain same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom, and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and supply the same in accordance with the obligation of the authority as the court shall direct.

To require the authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

History.

1938, p. 456; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(18).

§ 36-34.
Housing bonds to be legal investments, legal security and negotiable.

The Commonwealth and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions (other than housing authorities), and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, except domestic life insurance companies may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law, or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when such bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States government or any agency thereof, and such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this Commonwealth; it being the purpose of this act to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including (but not limited to) sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations and that any such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this Commonwealth; provided, however, that nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person, firm or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History.

1942, p. 404; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(25).

§ 36-35.
Contracts and covenants with federal government, etc.; agreements to sell.

In any contract or amendatory or superseding contract for a loan and annual contributions heretofore or hereafter entered into between a housing authority and the federal government with respect to any housing project undertaken by the housing authority, any such housing authority is authorized to make such covenants (including covenants with holders of obligations of the authority issued for purposes of the project involved) and to confer upon the federal government such rights and remedies, as the housing authority deems necessary to assure the fulfillment of the purposes for which the project was undertaken. In any such contract, the housing authority may, notwithstanding any other provisions of law, agree to sell and convey the project (including all lands appertaining thereto) to which such contract relates to the federal government upon the occurrence of such conditions, or upon such defaults on obligations for which any of the annual contributions provided in such contract are pledged, as may be prescribed in such contract, and at a price (which may include the assumption by the federal government of the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations of the housing authority issued for purposes of the project involved) determined as prescribed therein and upon such other terms and conditions as are therein provided. Any such housing authority is hereby authorized to enter into such supplementary contracts, and to execute such conveyances, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions hereof. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any contracts or supplementary contracts or conveyances made or executed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be or constitute a mortgage within the meaning or for the purposes of any of the laws of this Commonwealth.

History.

1942, p. 326; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(4o).